en: Color depth: 16-bit; 24-bit; 30-bit; 36-bit; 42-bit; 48-bit; 8-bit; Other
el: Βάθος χρώματος: 16-bit; 24-bit; 30-bit; 36-bit; 42-bit; 48-bit; 8-bit; Άλλο
hr-HR: Dubina boje: 16-bitni; 24-bitni; 30-bitna; 36-bitna; 42-bitna; 48-bitna; 8-bitni; Ostalo
sv: Färgdjup: 16-bitars; 24-bitars; 30-bitar; 36-bitar; 42-bitar; 48-bitar; 8-bitars; Övrigt
zh-TW: 色彩深度: 16 位元; 24 位元; 30 位元; 36 位元; 42 位元; 48 位元; 8 位元; 其他
da: Farvedybde: 16-bit; 24-bit; 30-bit; 36-bit; 42-bit; 48-bit; 8-bit; Andet
lt-LT: Spalvų gylis: 16 bitų; 24 bitų; 30 bitų; 36 bitų; 42 bitų; 48 bitų; 8 bitų; Kita
nb: Fargedybde: 16-bit; 24-bit; 30-bit; 36-bit; 42-bit; 48-bit; 8-bit; Annet
sk-SK: Hĺbka farby: 16-bitový; 24-bitový; 30-bitová; 36-bitová; 42-bitová; 48-bitová; 8-bitový; Iné
ko: 색상 심도: 16비트; 24비트; 30비트; 36비트; 42비트; 48비트; 8비트; 기타
fi: Värisyvyys: 16-bittinen; 24-bittinen; 30-bittinen; 36-bittinen; 42-bittinen; 48-bittinen; 8-bittinen; Muu
tr: Renk derinliği: 16 bit; 24 bit; 30-bit; 36-bit; 42-bit; 48-bit; 8 bit; Diğer
es: Profundidad de color: 16 bits; 24 bits; 30 bits; 36 bits; 42 bits; 48 bits; 8 bits; Otros
pt-PT: Profundidade de cor: 16 bits; 24 bits; 30 bits; 36 bits; 42 bits; 48 bits; 8 bits; Outro
it: Profondità colore: 16 bit; 24 bit; 30 bit; 36 bit; 42 bit; 48 bit; 8 bit; Altro
ru: Глубина цвета: 16-битный; 24-битный; 30-бит; 36-бит; 42-бит; 48-бит; 8-битный; Другой
sl-SI: Barvna globina: 16-bitna; 24-bitna; 30-bitna; 36-bitna; 42-bitna; 48-bitna; 8-bitna; Drugo
zh-CN: 色彩深度: 16 位; 24 位; 30 位; 36 位; 42 位; 48 位; 8 位; 其他
nl: Kleurdiepte: 16-bit; 24-bit; 30-bit; 36-bit; 42-bit; 48-bit; 8-bit; Andere
hu: Színmélység: 16 bites; 24 bites; 30 bites; 36 bites; 42 bites; 48 bites; 8 bites; Egyéb
fr: Profondeur de couleur: 16 bits; 24 bits; 30 bits; 36 bits; 42 bits; 48 bits; 8 bits; Autre
pl: Głębia kolorów: 16-bitowa; 24-bitowa; 30-bitowa; 36-bitowa; 42-bitowa; 48-bitowa; 8-bitowa; Inne
de: Farbtiefe: 16-Bit; 24-Bit; 30-Bit; 36-Bit; 42-Bit; 48-Bit; 8-Bit; Sonstiges
vi: Độ sâu màu: 16-bit; 24-bit; 30-bit; 36-bit; 42-bit; 48-bit; 8-bit; Khác
cs: Barevná hloubka: 16-bit; 24-bit; 30bitová; 36bitová; 42bitová; 48bitová; 8-bit; Jiné
bg-BG: Дълбочина на цвета: 16-битов; 24-битов; 30-битова; 36-битова; 42-битова; 48-битова; 8-битов; Други
ro-RO: Profunzime culoare: 16 biți; 24 biți; 30 biți; 36 biți; 42 biți; 48 biți; 8 biți; Altele
ja: 色深度: 16ビット; 24ビット; 30ビット; 36ビット; 42ビット; 48ビット; 8ビット; その他
pt-BR: Profundidade de cor: 16 bits; 24 bits; 30 bits; 36 bits; 42 bits; 48 bits; 8 bits; Outro
th: ความลึกสี: 16 บิต; 24 บิต; 30 บิต; 36 บิต; 42 บิต; 48 บิต; 8 บิต; อื่นๆ